Vermont, session 2025-2026, H119.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 10 V.S.A. § 1521 is amended to read:
§ 1521. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
(1) “Beverage” means beer or other malt beverages and mineral waters,
cider, hard kombucha, mixed wine drink, soda carbonated and noncarbonated
water or seltzer, and carbonated and noncarbonated soft drinks in liquid form
and intended for human consumption. “Beverage” also means liquor and
ready-to-drink spirits beverage.
* * *
VT LEG #380030 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.119
2025 Page 2 of 3
(3) “Container” means the individual, separate, bottle, can, jar, or carton
composed of glass, metal, paper, plastic, or any combination of those materials
containing a consumer product. This definition shall not include containers
made of biodegradable material.
* * *
(9) “Mixed wine drink” means a beverage containing wine and more
than 15 percent added plain, carbonated, or sparkling water and that contains
added natural or artificial blended material, such as fruit juices, flavors,
flavoring, adjuncts, coloring, or preservatives; that contains not more than 16
percent alcohol by volume; or other similar product marketed as a wine cooler.
(10) “Liquor” means spirits as defined in 7 V.S.A. § 2.
(11) “Cider” has the same meaning as in 7 V.S.A. § 2.
(12) “Hard kombucha” means a fermented beverage produced from a
mixture of steeped tea and sugar, combined with a culture of yeast strains and
bacteria, that has an alcohol content of 0.5 percent or more alcohol by volume.
(13) “Soft drink” has the same meaning as in 32 V.S.A. § 9701.
Sec. 2. 10 V.S.A. § 1522 is amended to read:
§ 1522. BEVERAGE CONTAINERS; DEPOSIT
(a) Except with respect to beverage containers that contain liquor, a deposit
of not less than five 10 cents shall be paid by the consumer on each beverage
container sold at the retail level and refunded to the consumer upon return of
VT LEG #380030 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.119
2025 Page 3 of 3
the empty beverage container. With respect to beverage containers of volume
greater than 50 ml. that contain liquor, a deposit of 15 cents shall be paid by
the consumer on each beverage container sold at the retail level and refunded
to the consumer upon return of the empty beverage container. The difference
between liquor bottle deposits collected and refunds made is hereby retained
by the Liquor Control Enterprise Fund for administration of this subsection.
(b) A retailer or a person operating a redemption center who redeems
beverage containers shall be reimbursed by the manufacturer or distributor of
such beverage containers in an amount that is three and one-half cents per
container for containers of beverage brands that are part of a commingling
program and four cents per container for containers of beverage brands that are
not part of a commingling program.
* * *
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on January 1, 2026.
VT LEG #380030 v.1